Hawaii statutes.
§481-11 Remedies cumulative. The
remedies prescribed in this part are cumulative and in addition to the remedies
prescribed in chapter 269 for discriminations by public utilities. If any
conflict arises between this part and chapter 269, the latter prevails. [L
1937, c 223, pt of §12; RL 1945, §9332; am L 1955, c 241, §1(g); RL 1955,
§205-13; HRS §481-11]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next